South Dakota, session 2026, HB1014.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 16-2-58.2 be AMENDED:
16-2-58.2. For the answer or initial responsive pleading in a circuit court
proceeding not subject to § 16-2-58.1, the clerk of courts shall collect the sum of twenty-
five dollars as a commission on equal access to our courts surcharge. The clerk shall collect
the surcharge in the manner in which other fees are collected. The surcharge may not be
collected in any civil action or proceeding:
(1) For forcible entry and detainer;
(2) Wherein the responding party is the state, county, a municipality, or a school
district; or
(3) If the responding party is receiving assistance benefits under title 28.
The responsive surcharge may be waived pursuant to the provisions of §§ 16-2-
29.2 and 16-2-29.3.

26.290.10 2 1014
An Act to modify the surcharge for a responding party in a forcible entry and detainer action.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1014
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1014 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1014 ENROLLED